apertium-sqi.sqi.dix
    <pardef n="/kam__vbhaver">
      <e><p><l>kam</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ke</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ka</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kemi</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>keni</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kanë</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>pata</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pate</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pati</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>patëm</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>patët</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>patën</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>kisha</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kishe</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kishte</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kishim</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kishit</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kishin</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>kem</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kesh</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ketë</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kemi</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>keni</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kenë</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>paça</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>paç</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pastë</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>paçim</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>paçi</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>paçin</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>paskam</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>paske</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>paska</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>paskemi</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>paskeni</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>paskan</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ki</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kini</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>pasur</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
	  
<!-- "i pasur" (adj) means "rich" with opposite "i varfër"/"poor"
		it could be a noun as in "i pasuri, e pasura, të pasurit, të pasurat"
		perhaps "të pasurit" could be analyzed as a verbal noun meaning "having is better than not having"
		same analyzis for "mundur" below and all other verbs
		
      <e><p><l>pasur</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pasur</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pasuri</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pasuri</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pasuri</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pasurit</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pasurit</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pasurit</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pasurit</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pasurit</l><r>kam<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	  -->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mund__vbmod">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ëm</l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ët</l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ën</l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ë</l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ë</l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ë</l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ë</l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ë</l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ë</l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ur</l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
	  
<!--	  
      <e><p><l>ur</l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ur</l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uri</l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uri</l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uri</l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>urit</l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>urit</l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>urit</l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>urit</l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>urit</l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	  -->
    </pardef>

    <e lm="kam"><i/><par n="/kam__vbhaver"/></e>
    <e lm="mund"><i>mund</i><par n="mund__vbmod"/></e>
